Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-15,156
Conflict of interest; rules authorized.

A local housing agency may adopt rules implementing sections 71-15,149 to 71-15,157. Such rules may include the provision for such disciplinary actions in the event of violation of sections 71-15,149 to 71-15,157 as the housing agency's board of commissioners may deem appropriate.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 85.